Hawaii statutes.
[CHAPTER
435C]

HAWAII
MEDICAL MALPRACTICE UNDERWRITING PLAN

Section

435C-1 Purpose

435C-2 Definitions

435C-3 Joint underwriting plan, establishment

435C-4 Procedures

435C-5 Participation

435C-6 Directors

435C-7 Appeals and judicial review

435C-8 Privileged communications

435C-9 Annual statements

435C-10 Examinations

435C-11 Initiation of plan

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next